Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 1. Regulation of Hospitals.

Secs. 18.20.010 — 18.20.040.
Purpose; license required; application and fees; issuance and renewal of license and posting. [Repealed, § 45 ch 57 SLA 2005.]

Sec. 18.20.045.
Insurance required.
[Repealed, § 40 ch 177 SLA 1978.]

Secs. 18.20.050 — 18.20.070.
Denial, suspension, or revocation of license; regulations and standards; compliance with regulations. [Repealed, § 45 ch 57 SLA 2005.]

Sec. 18.20.075.
Risk management.

To be eligible for a license, each hospital shall have in operation an internal risk management program that shall

investigate the frequency and causes of incidents in hospitals that cause injury to patients;

develop and implement measures to minimize the risk of injury to patients; in developing these measures each hospital shall take into account recommendations of its medical staff, private underwriters, industry standards, experience of other hospitals, and recommendations of licensing boards of other health care providers; and

analyze patient grievances that relate to patient care.

The department shall adopt by regulation standards for the risk management programs in hospitals in the state which may vary according to the size of the hospital, the type of care offered by the hospital, and other factors found relevant by the department. Regulations adopted under this subsection are subject to AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act).

History.

(§ 39 ch 102 SLA 1976; am § 20 ch 30 SLA 1992)

Sec. 18.20.076.
Reports of suspended or revoked staff privileges. [Repealed, § 21 ch 87 SLA 1987.]

Sec. 18.20.080.
Inspection and consultation for alterations.

The department shall make annual inspections and investigations of hospital facilities. The department may accept accreditation by the Joint Commission on the Accreditation of Hospitals in lieu of an annual inspection by the department for the year in which the accreditation was granted if the accreditation standards of the commission are substantially similar to the inspection standards of the department.

The department may by regulation require that a licensee or applicant desiring to make a specified type of alteration or addition to its facilities or to construct new facilities shall, before commencing the alteration, addition, or new construction, submit plans and specifications to the department for preliminary inspection and approval or recommendations with respect to compliance with its regulations and standards.

History.

(§ 40-6-9 ACLA 1949; am § 5 ch 112 SLA 1957; am § 1 ch 40 SLA 1986)

Cross references. —

For requirement for certificate of need to alter a health care facility, see AS 18.07.

Administrative Code. —

For design and construction of health facilities, see 7 AAC 9.

Sec. 18.20.085.
Hospital records retention.

Unless specified otherwise by the department a hospital shall retain and preserve records that relate directly to the care and treatment of a patient for a period of seven years following the discharge of the patient. However, the records of a patient under 19 years of age shall be kept until at least two years after the patient has reached the age of 19 years or until seven years following the discharge of the patient, whichever is longer. Records consisting of X-ray film are required to be retained for five years.

The department shall by regulation define the types of records and the information required to be included in the records retained and preserved under (a) of this section. The department may by regulation specify records and information to be retained for longer periods than those set out in (a) of this section.

If a hospital ceases operation, it shall make immediate arrangements, as approved by the department, for the preservation of its records.

This section is subject to AS

18.23.100

.

In this section, “hospital” includes those facilities defined as hospitals under AS

18.20.130

and

18.20.210

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 41 SLA 1970; am § 1 ch 39 SLA 1995)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (d) was enacted as (e). Relettered in 1995, at which time former subsection (d) was relettered as (e). In 1995, in subsection (d), “AS

18.23.100

” was substituted for “AS

18.95.010

” to reflect the 1995 renumbering of AS

18.23.100

.

Administrative Code. —

For standards for operation of a community health facility, see 7 AAC 13, art. 3.

For standards for operation of a community mental health center, see 7 AAC 71, art. 3.

Collateral references. —

Admissibility on issue of sanity in expert opinion based partly on medical, psychological or hospital reports. 55 ALR3d 551.

Admissibility under business entry statutes of hospital records in criminal cases. 69 ALR3d 22.

Admissibility under Uniform Business Records as Evidence Act or similar statute of medical report made by consulting physician to treating physician. 69 ALR3d 104.

Admissibility under state law of hospital record relating to intoxication or sobriety of patient. 80 ALR3d 456.

Discovery of hospital’s internal records or communications as to qualifications or evaluations of individual physician. 81 ALR3d 944.

Sec. 18.20.090.
Disclosure of information. [Repealed, § 45 ch 57 SLA 2005.]

Sec. 18.20.095.
Mental health patient’s right to select staff; duties of hospital staff.

Except as provided in (d) of this section, a patient 18 years of age or older who is receiving mental health treatment and being provided intimate care at a hospital shall have a right to have care provided by a staff member who is the gender that the patient requests.

A supervisor or manager employed by a hospital shall

post a notice of the right provided under (a) of this section in a conspicuous place; and

if, after reasonable and good faith efforts to comply, the hospital is unable to comply with the requirement under (a) of this section,

document in the patient record that intimate care was provided by a licensed staff member of the gender opposite to the gender requested by the patient under (a) of this section; or

if a licensed staff member is not on duty at the time of the patient’s request under (a) of this section, document in the patient record that the care was provided by an unlicensed staff member of the gender opposite to that requested under (a) of this section.

Staff members employed by a hospital shall, in regard to patients receiving mental health treatment,

provide privacy for each patient, especially for patients who are the opposite gender and especially when patient care involves intimate bodily functions, unavoidable intimate touching, or nudity;

except when necessitated by a medical emergency that is documented in the patient’s record, avoid entering patient care areas for a person of the opposite gender and areas specified for persons of the opposite gender; and

conduct routine safety checks and rounds of bedrooms, bathrooms, and shower areas only of patients who are the same gender as the staff member.

A hospital is exempt from the requirements of (a) of this section if the treating psychiatrist for the patient at the hospital determines that compliance would adversely affect patient treatment and the psychiatrist documents the determination in the patient’s record.

In this section,

“intimate care” means hygienic care, including bathing, dressing, changing, and toileting, that involves a patient’s perineal area and, for a female patient, the patient’s breasts; “intimate care” does not include activities done in preparation for medical procedures;

“licensed staff member” means a person who is employed by the hospital to provide direct patient care and who is licensed or certified in the state as a physician or physician assistant under AS 08.64, direct-entry midwife under AS 08.65, nurse or nurse aide under AS 08.68, or physical therapist or occupational therapist under AS 08.84;

“mental health treatment” means admission to a hospital primarily for electroconvulsive treatment or treatment with psychotropic medication, or admission to and retention in a health care institution for other mental health treatment;

“staff member” means a person employed by a hospital to provide direct patient care.

History.

(§ 1 ch 59 SLA 2008)

Sec. 18.20.100.
Annual report of department. [Repealed, § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994.]

Secs. 18.20.110,
18.20.120.
Misdemeanor to establish or conduct hospital without license; definitions. [Repealed, § 45 ch 57 SLA 2005.]

Sec. 18.20.130.
Definitions.

In AS

18.20.075

—

18.20.130

,

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services;

“hospital” means an institution or establishment, public or private, devoted primarily to providing diagnosis, treatment, or care over a continuous period of 24 hours each day for two or more nonrelated individuals suffering from illness, physical or mental disease, injury or deformity, or any other condition for which medical or surgical services would be appropriate.

History.

(§ 40-6-1 ACLA 1949; am § 2 ch 112 SLA 1957; am § 2 ch 63 SLA 1964; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 72 SLA 1978; am §§ 7, 45 ch 57 SLA 2005)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1986 and 2012 to alphabetize the defined terms.